Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 17 Interstate Compacts for Protection of Resources

46-17-1.
Governor authorized to enter compacts.

The governor is hereby authorized to enter into compacts with the governors of other states for the protection of water resources of this state originating outside of this state and for the protection of water resources of other states originating within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1224, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-17-1

.

46-17-2.
Northeastern water and related land resources compact.

The governor on behalf of this state is authorized to enter into a compact, substantially in the following form, with the United States of America and with any two (2) or more of the states of Connecticut, Maine, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, and Vermont, and the legislature hereby signifies in advance its approval and ratification of the compact so entered into; the approval and ratification to be effective upon the filing of a copy of the compact in the office of the secretary of state:

ARTICLE I

The northeastern part of the United States is by virtue of geographic location and other characteristics a great natural resource area which, with more intense use of natural resources, increasingly requires coordinated planning as a basic ingredient of effective resource management and orderly growth of the region. The work of the New England-New York interagency committee demonstrated that a continuation and furtherance of activities such as those undertaken by it would be of great value. To this end, it is the intent of this compact to establish and provide for the operation of a joint agency for the northeast.

ARTICLE II

It is the purpose of this compact to provide, in the northeastern region, improved facilities and procedures for the coordination of the policies, programs, and activities of the United States, the several states, and private persons or entities, in the field of water and related land resources, and to study, investigate, and plan the development and use of the same and conservation of such water and related land resources; to provide means by which conflicts may be resolved; and to provide procedures for coordination of the interests of all public and private agencies, persons and entities in the field of water and related land resources; and to provide an organization for cooperation in such coordination on both the federal and state levels of government.

ARTICLE III

There is hereby created the northeastern resources commission, hereinafter called
“the commission”
.

ARTICLE IV

The commission shall consist of one member from each party state to be appointed and to serve, in accordance with and subject to the laws of the state which he or she represents, and seven (7) members representing departments or agencies of the United States having principal responsibilities for water and related land resources development to be appointed and to serve in such manner as may be provided by the laws of the United States.

ARTICLE V

It shall be the responsibility of the commission to recommend to the states and the United States, or any intergovernmental agency, changes in law or policy which would promote coordination, or resolution of problems, in the field of water and related land resources. The efforts of the commission in coordination of work and resolution of conflicts may be directed towards all state and federal activities involved in water and related land resources development responsibilities and shall include coordination of the following:

Collection and interpretation of basic data,

Investigation and planning of water and related land resources projects,

Programming (including scheduling) of water and related land resources construction and development,

Encouraging of the referral of plans or proposals for resources projects to the commission.

The commission shall use qualified public and private agencies to make investigations and conduct research in the field of water and related land resources, but if it is unable to secure the undertaking of such investigations or original research by a qualified public or private agency, it shall have the power to make its own investigations and conduct its own research. The commission may make contracts with any public or private agencies or private persons or entities for the undertaking of such investigations, or original research within its purview.

ARTICLE VI

No action of the commission respecting the internal management thereof shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the members are present and vote in favor thereof; provided, that any action not binding for such a reason may be ratified within thirty (30) days by the concurrence in writing of a majority of the commission membership. No action of the commission respecting a matter other than its internal management shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the state members and a majority of the members representing the United States are present and a majority of said state members together with a majority of said members representing the United States vote in favor thereof; provided, that any action not binding for such a reason may be ratified within thirty (30) days by the concurrence in writing of a majority of the state members and the concurrence in writing of a majority of the members representing the United States.

ARTICLE VII

A.

The commission shall submit to the governor or designated officer of each party state a request for funds to cover estimated expenditures for such period as may be required by the laws of that jurisdiction for presentation to the legislature thereof. Any such request shall indicate the sum or sums which the commission has requested or intends to request be appropriated by the United States for the use or support of the commission during the period covered thereby.

B.

With due regard for such monies and other assistance as may be made available to it, the commission shall be provided with such funds by each of the several states participating therein to provide the means of establishing and maintaining facilities, a staff of personnel, and such activities as may be necessary to fulfill the powers and duties imposed upon and entrusted to the commission.

With due allowance for monies otherwise available, each budget of the commission shall be the responsibility of the party states, to be apportioned among them on a weighted formula based fifty percent (50%) on population and fifty percent (50%) on gross land area, such population and gross land area to be determined in accordance with the last official United States census of population, but provided that the total contributions of all of the states shall not be required to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) annually and provided further that regardless of the number of states party to the compact at any time the maximum annual contribution required of any state shall not exceed its share of the fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) as determined above. Any state may contribute such funds in excess of its share, as determined above, as it may desire.

C.

The commission shall not pledge the credit of any jurisdiction. The commission may meet any of its obligations in whole or in part with funds available to it under article VIII(E) of this compact, provided that the commission takes specific action setting aside such funds prior to the incurring of any obligation to be met in whole or in part in such manner.

D.

The members of the commission shall be paid by the commission their actual expenses incurred and incident to the performance of their duties, subject to the approval of the commission.

E.

The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited by a qualified public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become a part of the annual report of the commission.

F.

The accounts of the commission shall be open at any reasonable time for inspection by such agency, representative, or representatives of the jurisdictions which appropriate funds to the commission.

ARTICLE VIII

A.

The commission may sue and be sued, and shall have a seal.

B.

The commission shall elect annually, from among its members, a chairperson, vice chairperson and treasurer. The commission shall appoint an executive director who shall also act as secretary, and together with the treasurer, shall be bonded in such amounts as the commission may require.

C.

The commission shall appoint and remove or discharge such personnel as may be necessary for the performance of its functions irrespective of any civil service laws which might otherwise apply. The commission shall establish and maintain, independently, by contract or agreement with the United States or an agency thereof, or in conjunction with any one or more of the party states, suitable retirement programs for its employees. Employees of the commission shall be eligible for social security coverage in respect to old age and survivors insurance provided that the commission takes such steps as may be necessary pursuant to federal law to participate in such program of insurance as a governmental agency or unit. The commission may establish and maintain or participate in such additional programs of employee benefits as may be appropriate to afford employees of the commission terms and conditions of employment similar to those enjoyed by employees of the party states generally.

D.

The commission may borrow, accept or contract for the services of personnel from any state or the United States or any subdivision or agency thereof, from any intergovernmental agency, or from any institution, person, firm or corporation.

E.

The commission may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this compact any and all appropriations, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state or the United States or any subdivision or agency thereof, or intergovernmental agency, or any institution, person, firm or corporation, and may receive, utilize and dispose of the same.

F.

The commission may establish and maintain such facilities as may be necessary for the transacting of its business. The commission may accept, hold, and convey real and personal property and any interest therein.

G.

The commission may adopt, amend, and rescind bylaws, rules, and regulations for the conduct of its business.

H.

The commission shall make and transmit annually, to the legislature and governor of each party state, and to the president and congress of the United States, a report covering the activities of the commission for the preceding year, and embodying such recommendations as may have been adopted by the commission. The commission may issue such additional reports as it may deem desirable.

ARTICLE IX

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to impair, or otherwise affect, the jurisdiction of any interstate agency in which any party state participates nor to abridge, impair, or otherwise affect the provisions of any compact to which any one or more of the party states may be a party, nor to supersede, diminish, or otherwise affect any obligation assumed under any such compact. Nor shall anything in this compact be construed to discourage additional interstate compacts among some or all of the party states for the management of natural resources, or the coordination of activities with respect to a specific natural resource or any aspect of natural resource management, or for the establishment of intergovernmental planning agencies in sub-areas of the region. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit the jurisdiction or activities of any participating government, agency, or officer thereof, or any private person or agency.

ARTICLE X

A.

This compact shall become effective when entered into and enacted into law by any three (3) of the states of Connecticut, Maine, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, Rhode Island and Vermont, and when the United States has provided by law for the designation of its representation on the commission. Thereafter it shall become effective with respect to any other aforementioned state upon its enacting this compact into law.

B.

Upon consent of the congress of the United States of America, any other state in the northeastern area may become a party to this compact, by entering into and enacting this compact into law.

ARTICLE XI

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each party state until renounced by it. Renunciation of this compact must be preceded by sending three (3) years’ notice in writing of intention to withdraw from the compact to the governor of each of the other states party hereto and to such officers or agencies of the United States as may be designated by federal law.

ARTICLE XII

The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof, to any state, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any other state, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. It is the legislative intent that the provisions of this compact be reasonably and liberally construed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 162, § 1.

46-17-3.
Ratification by Rhode Island.

When the governor shall have executed the compact on behalf of this state and caused a copy thereof to be filed in the office of the secretary of state, as required by §

46-17-2

, and the compact shall have been ratified by any three (3) or more of the states named in article X thereof in accordance with the constitution and laws of the states, and when the United States has provided by law for the designation of its representation on the commission, then the compact shall become operative and effective between this state and other members of the compact. The governor is hereby authorized and directed, upon the execution of the compact by the governor and the filing of the required copy thereof in the office of the secretary of state, to notify forthwith the governors of the named states and the president of the United States, that this state on its part has ratified the compact. The original notice of ratification received from the governor or other duly authorized official of any member joining in the compact shall be filed with the official copy of the compact in the office of the secretary of state; and the notice, if any, as may be received from the president or the congress of the United States, signifying that the United States has provided by law for the designation of its representation on the commission, shall be filed in the same manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 171, § 2.

46-17-4.
Appointment.

After the aforesaid compact shall become operative and effective as provided in §

46-17-3

, the governor shall appoint the member of the commission to represent this state on the northeastern resources commission. The member shall receive the expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of the duties of the commission as provided in article VII(D) of the compact.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 171, § 3.

46-17-5.
Powers.

There is hereby granted, to the commission and member from this state, all powers provided for in the compact and all powers necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular. All officers of this state are hereby authorized and directed to do all things necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular; it being hereby declared to be the policy of this state to perform and carry out the compact and the purposes thereof. All powers granted to the commission shall be in aid of and supplemental to, and in no event a limitation upon, the powers vested in the commission by the laws of this state or by the laws of other party states or by the congress or the terms of the compact.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 171, § 4.

46-17-6.
Audit.

The controller of the state of Rhode Island is hereby designated as the representative of this state to inspect the accounts of the commission in accordance with article VII(F) of the compact and to report the results of that inspection to the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 171, § 5.